New York, session 2025-2026, S7793.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 13.05 of the mental hygiene law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (h) to read as follows: 3 (h) The developmental disabilities advisory council shall submit a 4 report yearly to the governor, the temporary president of the senate and 5 the speaker of the assembly on the activities of the council. Such 6 report shall be delivered by the thirty-first of December of each calen- 7 dar year and shall be posted to the department's website. Such report 8 shall include, at minimum: 9 1. actions taken to foster public understanding and acceptance of 10 developmental disabilities; 11 2. recommendations made to the commissioner related to statewide 12 priorities and goals for services for individuals with developmental 13 disabilities, and the implementation of the statewide comprehensive plan 14 as required under section 5.07 of this chapter; and 15 3. any other actions taken by the council related to their duties. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11241-03-5